Georgia, session 2025_26, HB227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 227
- 1 -

25 LC 55 0411
15 PART I
16 SECTION 1-1.
17 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Putting Georgia's Patients First Act."
18 PART II
19 SECTION 2-1.
20 Title 2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to agriculture, is amended by
21 replacing "low THC oil" and "Low THC oil" with "medical cannabis" and "Medical
22 cannabis", respectively, wherever such terms occur in:
23 (1) Code Section 2-11-36, relating to seeds used in production of low THC oil;
24 (2) Code Section 2-23-9.2, relating to consumable hemp products, packaging,
25 advertising, and distribution; and
26 (3) Code Section 2-23-9.3, relating to location of retail establishments selling or
27 distributing consumable hemp products.
28 SECTION 2-2.
29 Article 9 of Chapter 12 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
30 access to medical cannabis, is amended by replacing "low THC oil" and "Low THC oil" with
31 "medical cannabis" and "Medical cannabis", respectively, and by replacing "Low THC Oil
32 Patient Registry" with "Medical Cannabis Patient Registry", wherever such terms occur in:
33 (1) Code Section 16-12-201, relating to prohibition against producing, growing,
34 manufacturing, or dispensing low THC oil or products;
35 (2) Code Section 16-12-203, relating to powers, duties, and responsibilities of the
36 Georgia Access to Medical Cannabis Commission;
H. B. 227
- 2 -

25 LC 55 0411
37 (3) Code Section 16-12-204, relating to nontransferable designated university licenses
38 to produce low THC oil and products, research and reporting of collected information,
39 and license revocation;
40 (4) Code Section 16-12-206, relating to annual, nontransferable dispensing license,
41 adoption of rules, and fees;
42 (5) Code Section 16-12-210, relating to powers, duties, and responsibilities of the
43 Georgia Access to Medical Cannabis Commission, no undue burden on patients, and
44 remission of fees;
45 (6) Code Section 16-12-211, relating to class 1 production licenses, application fees,
46 revocation, and limitation on ownership;
47 (7) Code Section 16-12-212, relating to class 2 production licenses, application fee,
48 revocation, and limitation on ownership;
49 (8) Code Section 16-12-213, relating to tracking system requirements;
50 (9) Code Section 16-12-216, relating to Bureau of Investigation, Access to Medical
51 Cannabis Commission, and Composite Medical Board to jointly establish procedures to
52 ensure compliance;
53 (10) Code Section 16-12-217, relating to on-demand access to facilities, provision of
54 samples, testing, and secured transportation;
55 (11) Code Section 16-12-224, relating to limitation on ownership by member or former
56 member of the Georgia Access to Medical Cannabis Commission, limitation on
57 physician’s involvement, and identification when contributing to political campaigns;
58 (12) Code Section 16-12-225, relating to criminal offenses and penalties;
59 (13) Code Section 16-12-226, relating to sales and use taxes applicable;
60 (14) Code Section 16-12-230, relating to requirements for dispensing low THC oil and
61 products;
62 (15) Code Section 16-12-231, relating to exemptions from arrest, prosecutions, or
63 penalty;
H. B. 227
- 3 -

25 LC 55 0411
64 (16) Code Section 16-12-233, relating to contracts not against public policy;
65 (17) Code Section 16-12-234, relating to unlawful ways to ingest low THC oil or
66 products;
67 (18) Code Section 16-12-235, relating to research in compliance with federal regulations;
68 and
69 (19) Code Section 16-12-235.1, relating to possession of low THC oil and products by
70 colleges and universities for research purposes, permitting requirements, and inspection.
71 SECTION 2-3.
72 Article 1 of Chapter 2A of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
73 general provisions relative to the Department of Public Health, is amended in Code
74 Section 31-2A-18, relating to low THC oil patient registry, registration cards, reports, waiver
75 forms, and annual review and recommendations, by replacing "low THC oil" and "Low THC
76 oil" with "medical cannabis" and "Medical cannabis", respectively, and by replacing "Low
77 THC Oil Patient Registry" with "Medical Cannabis Patient Registry" wherever such terms
78 occur.
79 SECTION 2-4.
80 Chapter 1 of Title 51 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
81 provisions relative to torts, is amended in Code Section 51-1-29.6, relating to liability of
82 healthcare institutions and providers regarding low THC oil, by replacing "low THC oil" and
83 "Low THC oil" with "medical cannabis" and "Medical cannabis", respectively.
H. B. 227
- 4 -

25 LC 55 0411
84 PART III
85 SECTION 3-1.
86 Chapter 12 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to offenses against
87 public health and morals, is amended by revising Article 8, relating to regulation of low THC
88 oil, as follows:
89 "ARTICLE 8.
90 16-12-190.
91 As used in this article, the term:
92 (1) 'Hemp' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 2-23-3.
93 (2) 'Hemp products' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 2-23-3.
94 (3) 'Medical cannabis' 'low THC oil' means an oil that contains an amount of cannabidiol
95 and not more than 5 percent by weight of tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinolic
96 acid, or a combination of tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid which
97 does not contain plant material exhibiting the external morphological features of the plant
98 of the genus Cannabis. Such term shall not mean include:
99 (A) Goods products approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration under
100 Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; or
101 (B) Hemp or hemp products.
102 (4) 'Product' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-12-200.
103 16-12-191.
104 (a)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 13 of this title, it shall be lawful for any
105 person to possess, purchase, or have under his or her control 20 fluid ounces or less of
106 low THC oil medical cannabis or a product or products containing an equivalent amount
107 of medical cannabis if such substance medical cannabis or product or products is in a
H. B. 227
- 5 -

25 LC 55 0411
108 pharmaceutical container labeled by the manufacturer indicating the percentage of
109 tetrahydrocannabinol therein and:
110 (A) Such person is registered with the Department of Public Health as set forth in Code
111 Section 31-2A-18 and has in his or her possession a registration card issued by the
112 Department of Public Health; or
113 (B) Such person has in his or her possession a registration card issued by another state
114 that allows the same possession of low THC oil medical cannabis as provided by this
115 state's law; provided, however, that such registration card shall not be lawful authority
116 when such person has been present in this state for 45 days or more.
117 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 13 of this title, any person who possesses,
118 purchases, or has under his or her control 20 fluid ounces or less of low THC oil medical
119 cannabis or a product or products containing an equivalent amount of medical cannabis
120 without complying with paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be punished as for a
121 misdemeanor.
122 (b)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 13 of this title, it shall be lawful for any
123 person to possess, purchase, or have under his or her control 20 fluid ounces or less of
124 low THC oil medical cannabis or a product or products containing an equivalent amount
125 of medical cannabis if:
126 (A) Such person is involved in a clinical research program being conducted by the
127 Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia or any authorized clinical trial
128 or research study in this state or their its authorized agent as:
129 (i) A program participant;
130 (ii) A parent, guardian, or legal custodian of a program participant;
131 (iii) An employee of the board of regents designated to participate in the research
132 program;
133 (iv) A program agent;
134 (v) A program collaborator and their its designated employees;
H. B. 227
- 6 -

25 LC 55 0411
135 (vi) A program supplier and their its designated employees;
136 (vii) A program physician;
137 (viii) A program clinical researcher;
138 (ix) Program pharmacy personnel; or
139 (x) Other program medical personnel; and
140 (B) Such substance medical cannabis or product or products is in a pharmaceutical
141 container labeled by the manufacturer indicating the percentage of tetrahydrocannabinol
142 therein.
143 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 13 of this title, any person who possesses,
144 purchases, or has under his or her control 20 fluid ounces or less of low THC oil medical
145 cannabis or a product or products containing an equivalent amount of medical cannabis
146 without complying with subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1) of this
147 subsection shall be punished as for a misdemeanor.
148 (c) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 13 of this title, any person having possession
149 of, purchasing, or having under his or her control more than 20 fluid ounces of low THC
150 oil but less than 160 fluid ounces of low THC oil medical cannabis or a product or products
151 containing an equivalent amount of medical cannabis or who manufactures, distributes,
152 dispenses, sells, purchases, or possesses with the intent to distribute low THC oil medical
153 cannabis shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by
154 imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than ten years, a fine not to
155 exceed $50,000.00, or both.
156 (d) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 13 of this title, any person who sells,
157 manufactures, delivers, brings into this state, purchases, or has possession of 160 or more
158 fluid ounces of low THC oil medical cannabis or a product or products containing an
159 equivalent amount of medical cannabis shall be guilty of the felony offense of trafficking
160 in low THC oil medical cannabis and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as
161 follows:
H. B. 227
- 7 -

25 LC 55 0411
162 (1) If the quantity of low THC oil medical cannabis is at least 160 fluid ounces but less
163 than 31,000 fluid ounces, or the product or products contain an equivalent amount of
164 medical cannabis, by imprisonment for not less than five years nor more than ten years
165 and a fine not to exceed $100,000.00;
166 (2) If the quantity of low THC oil medical cannabis is at least 31,000 fluid ounces but
167 less than 154,000 fluid ounces, or the product or products contain an equivalent amount
168 of medical cannabis, by imprisonment for not less than seven years nor more than 15
169 years and a fine not to exceed $250,000.00; and
170 (3) If the quantity of low THC oil medical cannabis is 154,000 or more fluid ounces, or
171 the product or products contain an equivalent amount of medical cannabis, by
172 imprisonment for not less than ten years nor more than 20 years and a fine not to
173 exceed $1 million.
174 (e) Subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section shall not apply to a person involved in a
175 research program being conducted by the Board of Regents of the University System of
176 Georgia or its authorized agent as an employee of the board of regents designated to
177 participate in such program, a program agent, a program collaborator and their its
178 designated employees, a program supplier and their its designated employees, a physician,
179 clinical researcher, pharmacy personnel, or other medical personnel.
180 (f) Subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section shall not apply to a designated university,
181 pharmacy, or licensee under Article 9 of Chapter 12 of Title 16, provided that such
182 possession, purchase, control, sale, manufacturing, distribution, or dispensing is solely
183 conducted in accordance with the provisions of Article 9 of Chapter 12 of Title 16.
184 (g) Nothing in this article shall require an employer to permit or accommodate the use,
185 consumption, possession, transfer, display, transportation, purchase, sale, or growing of
186 marijuana in any form, or to affect the ability of an employer to have a written zero
187 tolerance policy prohibiting the on-duty, and off-duty, use of marijuana, or prohibiting any
H. B. 227
- 8 -

25 LC 55 0411
188 employee from having a detectable amount of marijuana in such employee's system while
189 at work."
190 SECTION 3-2.
191 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 16-12-200, relating to definitions
192 relative to access to medical cannabis, as follows:
193 "16-12-200.
194 As used in this article, the term:
195 (1) 'Applicant' means a corporate entity applying for a license pursuant to this article.
196 (2) 'Available capital' means corporate assets that are available to fund business
197 operations in the event a license is awarded pursuant to Part 2 of this article.
198 (3) 'Class 1 production license' means a license to produce and manufacture low THC
199 oil medical cannabis and products issued pursuant to Code Section 16-12-211.
200 (4) 'Class 2 production license' means a license to produce and manufacture low THC
201 oil medical cannabis and products issued pursuant to Code Section 16-12-212.
202 (5) 'Commission' means the Georgia Access to Medical Cannabis Commission created
203 pursuant to Code Section 16-12-202.
204 (6) 'Designated universities' means the University of Georgia and Fort Valley State
205 University.
206 (7) 'Designated university license' means a license issued by the commission pursuant
207 to this article to a designated university to, separately or jointly, produce, manufacture,
208 and purchase low THC oil medical cannabis and products in accordance with this article.
209 (8) 'Dispense' means the sale or provision of low THC oil medical cannabis and products
210 to registered patients by a dispensing licensee.
211 (9) 'Dispensing license' means a specialty license issued by the State Board of Pharmacy
212 or the commission pursuant to Code Section 16-12-206 to dispense low THC oil medical
213 cannabis and products to registered patients.
H. B. 227
- 9 -

25 LC 55 0411
214 (10) 'Grow' means cultivating and harvesting cannabis for use in producing low THC oil
215 medical cannabis and products.
216 (10.1) 'Hemp products' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 2-23-3.
217 (11) 'Licensee' means any business, or owner of such business, with a valid license
218 issued pursuant to this article.
219 (12) 'Low THC oil' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-12-190.
220 (13) 'Manufacture' means to process cannabis to produce low THC oil medical cannabis
221 and products.
222 (13) 'Medical cannabis' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
223 Section 16-12-190.
224 (14) 'Owner' means any person who directly or indirectly owns, actually or beneficially,
225 or controls 5 percent or greater of interests of the applicant or any licensee. In the event
226 that one person owns a beneficial right to interests and another person holds the voting
227 rights with respect to such interests, then both shall be considered an owner of such
228 interests.
229 (15) 'Product' means low THC oil medical cannabis delivered through an oil, tincture,
230 transdermal patch, lotion, or capsule, except as prohibited by Code Section 16-12-234,
231 but not including hemp products or any food products infused with low THC oil medical
232 cannabis, including, but not limited to, cookies, candies, or edibles.
233 (16) 'Registered patient' means an individual who is legally authorized to possess and use
234 low THC oil medical cannabis and products pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-18.
235 (17) 'Tracking system' means a seed-to-sale tracking system to track marijuana that is
236 grown, processed, manufactured, transferred, stored, or disposed of and low THC oil
237 medical cannabis and products that are transferred, stored, sold, dispensed, or disposed
238 of pursuant to this article."
H. B. 227
- 10 -

25 LC 55 0411
239 SECTION 3-3.
240 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 16-12-203, relating to the powers, duties,
241 and responsibilities of the Georgia Access to Medical Cannabis Commission, by adding a
242 new paragraph to read as follows:
243 "(10.1) To engage in public awareness activities concerning the medical cannabis
244 program in this state and effective uses of medical cannabis and products, including, but
245 not limited to, publishing materials and conducting outreach and public education
246 activities to inform members of the public, law enforcement, and healthcare providers
247 about the medical cannabis program in this state and the potential benefits that medical
248 cannabis and products may have to eligible patients;"
249 SECTION 3-4.
250 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 16-12-215, relating to limitations
251 on locations, advertising or marketing prohibited, and information available to physicians,
252 as follows:
253 "16-12-215.
254 (a) No licensee shall operate in any location, whether for cultivation, harvesting, and
255 processing of marijuana or for processing, manufacturing, packaging, or distributing low
256 THC oil medical cannabis or products, within a 3,000 foot radius of a covered entity,
257 measured from property boundary to property boundary. No dispensing licensee may
258 operate in any location within a 1,000 foot radius of a covered entity, measured from
259 property boundary to property boundary. Notwithstanding the provisions of this
260 subsection, local governments may, via use of existing zoning powers otherwise provided
261 by law, allow dispensing licensees only to locate in places other than those provided in this
262 subsection so long as such modification is needed to allow retail outlets to be established
263 to service registered patients residing within such local jurisdiction. As used in this
264 subsection, the term 'covered entity' means a public or private school; an early care and
H. B. 227
- 11 -

25 LC 55 0411
265 education program as defined in Code Section 20-1A-2; or a church, synagogue, or other
266 place of public religious worship, in existence prior to the date of licensure of such licensee
267 by the commission or State Board of Pharmacy.
268 (b)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, no No licensee shall
269 advertise or market low THC oil medical cannabis or products to registered patients or
270 the public.
271 (2) A; provided, however, that a licensee shall be authorized to provide information:
272 (A) Regarding regarding its low THC oil medical cannabis and products directly to
273 physicians and healthcare providers; and
274 (B) About the legal and safe uses of medical cannabis and products to registered
275 patients or the public.
276 (3) Any information provided by a licensee pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection
277 shall not:
278 (A) Include any medical claim, unless such claim is supported by reliable scientific
279 evidence;
280 (B) Make any false or misleading claim; or
281 (C) Be attractive to children or otherwise directly or indirectly targeted to individuals
282 under 21 years of age. As used in this subparagraph, the term 'attractive to children'
283 shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 2-23-3."
284 SECTION 3-5.
285 Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
286 regulation of controlled substances, is amended in Code Section 16-13-21, relating to
287 definitions, by revising paragraph (16) as follows:
288 "(16) 'Marijuana' means all parts of the plant of the genus Cannabis, whether growing or
289 not, the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of such plant, and every
290 compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its seeds,
H. B. 227
- 12 -

25 LC 55 0411
291 or resin, but shall not include samples as described in subparagraph (P) of paragraph (3)
292 of Code Section 16-13-25; shall not include the completely defoliated mature stalks of
293 such plant, fiber produced from such stalks, oil, or cake, or the completely sterilized
294 samples of seeds of the plant which are incapable of germination; and shall not include
295 hemp or hemp products, as such terms are defined in Code Section 2-23-3, or medical
296 cannabis or products, as such terms are defined in Code Sections 16-12-190 and
297 16-12-200, respectively, when in the possession or control of a person authorized to
298 possess and control such medical cannabis or products under the provisions of Article 8
299 or Article 9 of Chapter 12 of this title. Such term shall not include products approved by
300 the federal Food and Drug Administration under Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug,
301 and Cosmetic Act."
302 SECTION 3-6.
303 Said article is further amended in Code Section 16-13-25, relating to Schedule I, by revising
304 subparagraph (P) of paragraph (3) as follows:
305 "(P) Tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, or a combination of
306 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid which does not contain plant
307 material exhibiting the external morphological features of the plant of the genus
308 Cannabis, but not including such substance when found in hemp or hemp products, as
309 such terms are defined in Code Section 2-23-3, or in medical cannabis or products, as
310 such terms are defined in Code Sections 16-12-190 and 16-12-200, respectively, when
311 in the possession or control of a person authorized to possess or control such medical
312 cannabis or products under the provisions of Article 8 or Article 9 of Chapter 12 of this
313 title. Tetrahydrocannabinols do not include products approved by the federal Food and
314 Drug Administration under Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;"
H. B. 227
- 13 -

25 LC 55 0411
315 SECTION 3-7.
316 Article 1 of Chapter 2A of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
317 general provisions relative to the Department of Public Health, is amended in Code
318 Section 31-2A-18, relating to Low THC Oil Patient Registry, registration cards, reports,
319 waiver forms, and annual review and recommendations, by revising paragraph (3) of
320 subsection (a) as follows:
321 "(3) 'Condition' means:
322 (A) Cancer, when such disease is diagnosed as end stage or the treatment produces
323 related wasting illness or recalcitrant nausea and vomiting;
324 (B) Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end
325 stage;
326 (C) Seizure disorders related to a diagnosis of epilepsy or trauma related head injuries;
327 (D) Multiple sclerosis, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end stage;
328 (E) Crohn's disease;
329 (F) Mitochondrial disease;
330 (G) Parkinson's disease, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end stage;
331 (H) Sickle cell disease, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end stage;
332 (I) Tourette's syndrome, when such syndrome is diagnosed as severe;
333 (J) Autism spectrum disorder, when such disorder is diagnosed for a patient who is at
334 least 18 years of age, or severe autism, when diagnosed for a patient who is less than
335 18 years of age;
336 (K) Epidermolysis bullosa;
337 (L) Alzheimer's disease, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end stage;
338 (M) Acquired immune deficiency syndrome, when such syndrome is diagnosed as
339 severe or end stage;
340 (N) Peripheral neuropathy, when such symptoms are diagnosed as severe or end stage;
H. B. 227
- 14 -

25 LC 55 0411
341 (O) Post-traumatic stress disorder resulting from direct exposure to or the witnessing
342 of a trauma for a patient who is at least 18 years of age; or
343 (P) Intractable pain."
344 PART IV
345 SECTION 4-1.
346 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 227
- 15 -